sv: Tidsperiod: 1900-talet; Antik; Samtida; Historiskt; Industriella revolutionen; Medeltida; Modern; Förhistorisk; Renässans; Övrigt
zh-CN: 时间段: 20 世纪; 古代; 当代; 历史; 工业革命; 中世纪; 现代; 史前; 文艺复兴; 其他
nb: Tidsperiode: århundre; Eldgammel; Moderne; Historisk; Industriell revolusjon; Middelalder; Moderne; Forhistorisk; Renessanse; Annet
it: Periodo di tempo: 20° secolo; Antico; Contemporaneo; Storico; Rivoluzione industriale; Medievale; Età moderna; Preistorico; Rinascimento; Altro
pl: Okres: XX wiek; Starożytny; Współczesna; Historyczny; Rewolucja przemysłowa; Średniowiecze; Nowoczesna; Prehistoryczny; Renesans; Inne
es: Periodo de tiempo: Siglo 20; Antiguo; Contemporáneo; Histórico; Revolución industrial; Medieval; Moderno; Prehistórico; Renacimiento; Otros
tr: Zaman dilimi: yüzyıl; Antik; Modern; Tarihi; Sanayi devrimi; Orta çağ; Modern; Tarih öncesi; Rönesans; Diğer
ro-RO: Perioada de timp: Secolul al XX-lea; Antichitate; Contemporană; Istorică; Revoluție industrială; Medievală; Modernă; Preistorică; Renaștere; Altele
en: Time period: 20th century; Ancient; Contemporary; Historical; Industrial revolution; Medieval; Modern; Prehistoric; Renaissance; Other
hr-HR: Razdoblje: 20. stoljeće; Drevno; Suvremeno; Povijesno; Industrijska revolucija; Srednjovjekovno; Moderno; Prapovijesno; Renesansa; Ostalo
sl-SI: Časovno obdobje: 20. stoletje; Starodavna; Sodobna; Zgodovinska; Industrijska revolucija; Srednjeveška; Moderno; Prazgodovinska; Renesansa; Drugo
pt-BR: Período de tempo: Século XX; Ancestral; Contemporâneo; Histórico; Revolução Industrial; Medieval; Moderno; Pré-histórico; Renascimento; Outro
fi: Ajanjakso: 1900-luku; Muinainen; Nykyaikainen; Historiallinen; Teollinen vallankumous; Keskiaikainen; Moderni; Esihistoriallinen; Renessanssi; Muu
hu: Időszak: 20. század; Ősi; Kortárs; Történelmi; Ipari forradalom; Középkori; Modern; Őskori; Reneszánsz; Egyéb
lt-LT: Laikotarpis: XX amžiaus; Senoviniai; Šiuolaikiniai; Istoriniai; Pramonės revoliucija; Viduramžiai; Modernus; Priešistorinis; Renesansas; Kita
ko: 기간: 20세기; 고대; 컨템포러리; 역사; 산업 혁명; 중세; 현대; 선사 시대; 르네상스; 기타
vi: Khoảng thời gian: Thế kỷ 20; Cổ đại; Đương đại; Lịch sử; Cuộc cách mạng công nghiệp; Trung cổ; Hiện đại; Thời tiền sử; Phục hưng; Khác
da: Tidsperiode: århundrede; Gammel; Nutidig; Historie; Industriel revolution; Middelalder; Moderne; Forhistorisk; Renæssance; Andet
zh-TW: 時段: 20 世紀; 古老的; 當代; 歷史; 工業革命; 中世紀; 現代; 史前; 復興; 其他
pt-PT: Período: Século XX; Ancestral; Contemporâneo; Histórico; Revolução Industrial; Medieval; Moderno; Pré-histórico; Renascimento; Outro
nl: Tijdsperiode: 20ste eeuw; Oud; Hedendaags; Historisch; Industriële revolutie; Middeleeuws; Modern; Prehistorisch; Renaissance; Andere
ja: 時期: 20世紀; 古代; コンテンポラリー; ヒストリカル; 産業革命; 中世; モダン; 先史時代; ルネサンス; その他
fr: Période de temps: 20e siècle; Ancien; Contemporain; Historique; Révolution industrielle; Médiéval; Moderne; Préhistorique; Renaissance; Autre
de: Zeitraum: Jahrhundert; Antik; Zeitgenössisch; Historisch; Industrielle Revolution; Mittelalterlich; Modern; Prehistorisch; Renaissance; Sonstiges
el: Χρονική περίοδος: 20ος αιώνας; Αρχαίος; Επίκαιρη; Ιστορική; Βιομηχανική επανάσταση; Μεσαιωνική; Σύγχρονο; Προϊστορικός; Αναγέννηση; Άλλο
sk-SK: Časové obdobie: 20. storočia; Staroveký; Súčasný; Historický; Priemyselná revolúcia; Stredoveký; Moderný; Praveký; Renesančný; Iné
ru: Период времени: 20 век; Древний; Современный; Исторический; Промышленная революция; Средневековье; Современный; Доисторический; Ренессанс; Другой
cs: Časový úsek: století; Starověké; Moderní; Historické; Průmyslová revoluce; Středověk; Moderní; Prehistorické; Renesance; Jiné
bg-BG: Период от време: 20-ти век; Античен; Съвременен; Исторически; Индустриална революция; Средновековен; Модерен; Праисторически; Ренесанс; Други
th: ช่วงเวลา: ศตวรรษที่ 20; โบราณ; ร่วมสมัย; แบบอิงประวัติศาสตร์; การปฏิวัติอุตสาหกรรม; ยุคกลาง; โมเดิร์น; ก่อนประวัติศาสตร์; ยุคฟื้นฟูศิลปวิทยา; อื่นๆ